Utah statutes.
63F-1-103.   Department of Technology Services.

(1)  There is created within state government the Department of Technology Services which has all of the policymaking functions, regulatory and enforcement powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities outlined in this title.

(2)  The department has authority to operate as an internal service fund agency as provided in Section 63J-1-410.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

